Utah statutes.
52-1-11.   Bonds to cover special penalties and liabilities.

Whenever, except in criminal prosecutions, any special penalty, forfeiture or liability is imposed upon any officer for nonperformance or malperformance of his official duties, the liability therefor attaches to the official bond of such officer.

